Washington statutes.
RCW 36.81.020

Freeholders' petition—Bond.

Ten or more freeholders of any county may petition the board for the establishment of a county road in the vicinity of their residence, setting forth and describing the general course and terminal points of the proposed improvement and stating that the same is a public necessity. The petition must be accompanied by a bond in the penal sum of three hundred dollars, payable to the county, executed by one or more persons as principal or principals, with two or more sufficient sureties, conditioned that the petitioners will pay into the county road fund of the county all costs and expenses incurred by the county in examining and surveying the proposed road and in the proceedings thereon in case the road is not established by reason of its being impracticable or there not being funds therefor.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.81.020. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 20, part; RRS s 6450-20, part.]